Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-804.03
Clerk; bond or insurance; oath.

The clerk of the Commission of Industrial Relations shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201 before entering upon or discharging any of the duties of his or her office. Such clerk shall, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, take and subscribe the statutory oath of office.

Laws 1974, LB 819, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 24.